Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202481-1010
Chief of transportation services bureau; duties; responsibilities; Transportation Services Bureau Revolving Fund; created; use; investment.

The chief of the transportation services bureau shall have the following duties and responsibilities:

(1) To establish standards which a state agency must meet for the full-time assignment of state-owned vehicles;

(2) To create a motor pool or motor pools of bureau fleet vehicles for the use of agencies whose travel requirements do not meet the standards established under subdivision (1) of this section;

(3) To repair, maintain, and lease to state agencies state-owned vehicles and approve the acquisition, sale, or trade of each and every state-owned vehicle made by the materiel division of the Department of Administrative Services. The bureau may provide for repair and maintenance pursuant to subdivision (8) of this section;

(4) To consult with the various state agencies using bureau fleet vehicles and write specifications for state-owned vehicles to be purchased by the materiel division;

(5) To provide for the purchase only of state-owned vehicles used primarily for the transportation of state employees from funds received from the sale of surplus state-owned vehicles;

(6) To present to the accounting division of the Department of Administrative Services cost and maintenance records of state-owned vehicles and cost records of rented bureau fleet vehicles so that the various state agencies which use bureau fleet vehicles may be billed for such use. Income arising from these billings shall be deposited to the Transportation Services Bureau Revolving Fund, which fund is hereby created. All expenses of acquisition, operation, and maintenance of state-owned vehicles used primarily for transportation of state employees and of rental of bureau fleet vehicles shall be paid from such fund. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Beginning October 1, 2024, any investment earnings from investment of money in the fund shall be credited to the General Fund. Money in the Transportation Services Bureau Revolving Fund may be transferred to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. The Department of Administrative Services shall develop a system of time and mileage charges for the purpose of billing the various state agencies for their vehicle usage. The daily, weekly, or monthly charge shall cover all fixed expenses of such vehicles, and the mileage charge shall cover the variable costs of operation;

(7) To monitor the utilization of permanently assigned bureau fleet vehicles and enforce minimum utilization standards by withdrawing permanently assigned bureau fleet vehicles from agencies which are not meeting the standards established under subdivision (1) of this section;

(8) To enter into service agreements for the repair and maintenance of bureau fleet vehicles when it is determined that such action would be to the economic advantage of the state;

(9) To insure compliance with section 81-1021 for all state-owned vehicles; and

(10) To enter into rental agreements with any third-party fleet owner in the name of the State of Nebraska for passenger vehicles for use primarily for transportation of state employees for transportation in their official duties from one job location to another when it is determined that such action would be to the economic advantage of the state.

Laws 1969, c. 770, § 3, p. 2919;

Laws 1971, LB 28, § 6;

Laws 1972, LB 1452, § 2;

Laws 1976, LB 977, § 1;

Laws 1981, LB 381, § 11;

Laws 1983, LB 469, § 7;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 483;

Laws 2012, LB779, § 3;

Laws 2024, First Spec. Sess., LB3, § 34.
August 21, 2024
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.